Oklahoma, session 2025, SB643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 421, as last


amended by Section 4, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 421), is amended to read as follows:


Section 421. A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall


make available on its website in an easy-to-find location an


application for a medical marijuana dispensary license. The


application fee to be paid by the applicant shall be in the amounts


provided for in Section 427.14 of this title. A method of payment


for the application fee shall be provided on the website of the

Req. No. 1446 Page 1


Authority. Dispensary applicants must all be residents of Oklahoma.


Any entity applying for a dispensary license must be owned by a


resident of this state and must be registered to do business in this


state. The Authority shall have ninety (90) business days to review


the application; approve, reject, or deny the application; and send


the approval, rejection, or denial letter stating reasons for the


rejection or denial to the applicant in the same method the


application was submitted to the Authority.


B. The Authority shall approve all applications which meet the


following criteria:


1. The applicant must be twenty-five (25) years of age or


older;


2. The applicant, if applying as an individual, must show


residency in this state;


3. All applying entities must show that all members, managers,


and board members are residents of this state;


4. An applying entity may show ownership of nonstate residents,


but that percentage ownership may not exceed twenty-five percent


(25%) shall not have ownership by nonresidents of this state;


5. All applying individuals or entities must be registered to


conduct business in this state; and


6. All applicants must disclose all ownership interests in the


dispensary.



Req. No. 1446 Page 2


Applicants with a nonviolent felony conviction in the last two


(2) years, any other felony conviction in the last five (5) years,


inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections or any


person currently incarcerated shall not qualify for a medical


marijuana dispensary license.


C. Licensed medical marijuana dispensaries shall be required to


complete a monthly sales report to the Authority. This report shall


be due on the fifteenth of each month and provide reporting on the


previous month. This report shall detail the weight of marijuana


purchased at wholesale and the weight of marijuana sold to licensed


medical marijuana patients and licensed caregivers and account for


any waste. The report shall show total sales in dollars, tax


collected in dollars, and tax due in dollars. The Authority shall


have oversight and auditing responsibilities to ensure that all


marijuana being grown is accounted for.


D. Only a licensed medical marijuana dispensary may conduct


retail sales of marijuana or marijuana derivatives. Beginning on


November 1, 2021, licensed medical marijuana dispensaries shall be


authorized to package and sell pre-rolled marijuana to licensed


medical marijuana patients and licensed caregivers. The products


described in this subsection shall contain only the ground parts of


the marijuana plant and shall not include marijuana concentrates or


derivatives. The total net weight of each pre-roll packaged and


sold by a medical marijuana dispensary shall not exceed one (1)

Req. No. 1446 Page 3


gram. These products shall be tested, packaged and labeled in


accordance with state law and rules promulgated by the Executive


Director of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority.


E. No medical marijuana dispensary shall offer or allow a


medical marijuana patient licensee, caregiver licensee or other


member of the public to handle or otherwise have physical contact


with any medical marijuana not contained in a sealed or separate


package. Provided, such prohibition shall not preclude an employee


of the medical marijuana dispensary from handling loose or


nonpackaged medical marijuana to be placed in packaging consistent


with the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act and


the rules promulgated by the Executive Director for the packaging of


medical marijuana for retail sale. Provided, further, such


prohibition shall not prevent a medical marijuana dispensary from


displaying samples of its medical marijuana in separate display


cases, jars or other containers and allowing medical marijuana


patient licensees and caregiver licensees the ability to handle or


smell the various samples as long as the sample medical marijuana is


used for display purposes only and is not offered for retail sale.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 422, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 447, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 422), is amended to read as follows:


Section 422. A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall


make available on its website in an easy-to-find location an

Req. No. 1446 Page 4


application for a medical marijuana commercial grower license. The


application fee shall be paid by the applicant in the amounts


provided for in Section 427.14 of this title. A method of payment


for the application fee shall be provided on the website of the


Authority. The Authority shall have ninety (90) business days to


review the application; approve, reject, or deny the application;


and send the approval, rejection, or denial letter stating the


reasons for the rejection or denial to the applicant in the same


method the application was submitted to the Authority.


B. The Authority shall approve all applications which meet the


following criteria:


1. The applicant must be twenty-five (25) years of age or


older;


2. The applicant, if applying as an individual, must show


residency in this state;


3. All applying entities must show that all members, managers,


and board members are Oklahoma residents;


4. An applying entity may show ownership of non-Oklahoma


residents, but that percentage ownership may not exceed twenty-five


percent (25%) shall not have ownership by nonresidents of this


state;


5. All applying individuals or entities must be registered to


conduct business in this state; and



Req. No. 1446 Page 5


6. All applicants must disclose all ownership interests in the


commercial grower operation.


Applicants with a nonviolent felony conviction in the last two


(2) years, any other felony conviction in the last five (5) years,


inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections or any


person currently incarcerated shall not qualify for a commercial


grower license.


C. A licensed medical marijuana commercial grower may sell


marijuana to a licensed medical marijuana dispensary or a licensed


medical marijuana processor. Further, sales by a licensed medical


marijuana commercial grower shall be considered wholesale sales and


shall not be subject to taxation. Under no circumstances may a


licensed medical marijuana commercial grower sell marijuana directly


to a licensed medical marijuana patient or licensed medical


marijuana caregiver. A licensed medical marijuana commercial grower


may only sell at the wholesale level to a licensed medical marijuana


dispensary, a licensed medical marijuana commercial grower or a


licensed medical marijuana processor. If the federal government


lifts restrictions on buying and selling marijuana between states,


then a licensed medical marijuana commercial grower would be allowed


to sell and buy marijuana wholesale from, or to, an out-of-state


wholesale provider. A licensed medical marijuana commercial grower


shall be required to complete a monthly yield and sales report to


the Authority. This report shall be due on the fifteenth of each

Req. No. 1446 Page 6


month and provide reporting on the previous month. This report


shall detail the amount of marijuana harvested in pounds, the amount


of drying or dried marijuana on hand, the amount of marijuana sold


to licensed processors in pounds, the amount of waste in pounds, and


the amount of marijuana sold to licensed medical marijuana


dispensaries in pounds. Additionally, this report shall show total


wholesale sales in dollars. The Authority shall have oversight and


auditing responsibilities to ensure that all marijuana being grown


by licensed medical marijuana commercial growers is accounted for.


D. There shall be no limits on how much marijuana a licensed


medical marijuana commercial grower can grow.


E. Beginning on November 1, 2021, licensed medical marijuana


commercial growers shall be authorized to package and sell pre-


rolled marijuana to licensed medical marijuana dispensaries. The


products described in this subsection shall contain only the ground


parts of the marijuana plant and shall not include marijuana


concentrates or derivatives. The total net weight of each pre-roll


packaged and sold by licensed medical marijuana commercial growers


shall not exceed one (1) gram. These final products must be tested,


packaged and labeled in accordance with Oklahoma law and rules


promulgated by the Authority.


F. Beginning November 1, 2022, all medical marijuana commercial


grower licensees who operate an outdoor medical marijuana production


facility shall be required to register with the Oklahoma Department

Req. No. 1446 Page 7


of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry as an environmentally sensitive


crop owner. Registration shall provide notice to commercial and


private pesticide applicators of the locations of medical marijuana


crops and help minimize the potential for damaging pesticide drift.


Medical marijuana commercial grower licensees shall provide their


business name, address, Global Positioning System (GPS) coordinates


for all outdoor medical marijuana production facilities, and any


other information required by the Department when registering with


the Environmentally Sensitive Area Registry.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 423, as last


amended by Section 8, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 423), is amended to read as follows:


Section 423. A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall


make available on its website in an easy-to-find location an


application for a medical marijuana processing license. The


Authority shall be authorized to issue two types of medical


marijuana processor licenses based on the level of risk posed by the


type of processing conducted:


1. Nonhazardous medical marijuana processor license; and


2. Hazardous medical marijuana processor license.


The application fee for a nonhazardous or hazardous medical


marijuana processor license shall be paid by the applicant in the


amounts provided for in Section 427.14 of this title. A method of


payment shall be provided on the website of the Authority. The

Req. No. 1446 Page 8


Authority shall have ninety (90) business days to review the


application; approve, reject, or deny the application; and send the


approval, rejection, or denial letter stating the reasons for the


rejection or denial to the applicant in the same method the


application was submitted to the Authority.


B. The Authority shall approve all applications which meet the


following criteria:


1. The applicant must be twenty-five (25) years of age or


older;


2. The applicant, if applying as an individual, must show


residency in this state;


3. All applying entities must show that all members, managers,


and board members are Oklahoma residents of this state;


4. An applying entity may show ownership of nonstate residents,


but that percentage ownership may not exceed twenty-five percent


(25%) shall not have ownership by nonresidents of this state;


5. All applying individuals or entities must be registered to


conduct business in this state; and


6. All applicants must disclose all ownership interests in the


processing operation.


Applicants with a nonviolent felony conviction in the last two


(2) years, any other felony conviction in the last five (5) years,


inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections or any



Req. No. 1446 Page 9


person currently incarcerated shall not qualify for a medical


marijuana processing license.


C. 1. A licensed processor may take marijuana plants and


distill or process these plants into concentrates, edibles, and


other forms for consumption.


2. The Executive Director of the Authority shall make available


a set of standards which shall be used by licensed processors in the


preparation of edible marijuana products. The standards should be


in line with current food preparation guidelines. No excessive or


punitive rules may be established by the Executive Director.


3. Up to two times a year, the Authority may inspect a


processing operation and determine its compliance with the


preparation standards. If deficiencies are found, a written report


of the deficiency shall be issued to the licensed processor. The


licensed processor shall have one (1) month to correct the


deficiency or be subject to a fine of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)


for each deficiency.


4. A licensed processor may sell marijuana products it creates


to a licensed dispensary or any other licensed processor. All sales


by a licensed processor shall be considered wholesale sales and


shall not be subject to taxation.


5. Under no circumstances may a licensed processor sell


marijuana or any marijuana product directly to a licensed medical


marijuana patient or licensed caregiver. However, a licensed

Req. No. 1446 Page 10


processor may process cannabis into a concentrated form for a


licensed medical marijuana patient for a fee.


6. Licensed processors shall be required to complete a monthly


yield and sales report to the Authority. This report shall be due


on the fifteenth of each month and shall provide reporting on the


previous month. This report shall detail the amount of marijuana


and medical marijuana products purchased in pounds, the amount of


marijuana cooked or processed in pounds, and the amount of waste in


pounds. Additionally, this report shall show total wholesale sales


in dollars. The Authority shall have oversight and auditing


responsibilities to ensure that all marijuana being processed is


accounted for.


D. The Authority shall oversee the inspection and compliance of


licensed processors producing products with marijuana as an


additive. If it becomes permissible under federal law, marijuana


may be moved across state lines.


E. Any device used for the processing or consumption of medical


marijuana shall be considered legal to be sold, manufactured,


distributed and possessed. No merchant, wholesaler, manufacturer or


individual may be unduly harassed or prosecuted for selling,


manufacturing or possessing marijuana paraphernalia.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 427.30 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1446 Page 11


A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall require all


employees and owners of medical marijuana facilities to be citizens,


lawful permanent residents, or temporary residents of the United


States. The Authority may require that such residency be made as


part of an individual’s application for a license, permit,


identification card, or credential authorizing the individual to be


an employee of a medical marijuana facility.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Employee” means any natural person who:


a. grows, harvests, dries, cures, purchases, sells,


transfers, transports, processes, produces,


manufactures, creates, or packages medical marijuana,


medical marijuana products, or medical marijuana waste


on behalf of or for a licensed medical marijuana


commercial grower, processor, or dispensary,


b. samples, trains, or educates on behalf of or for a


licensed medical marijuana education or research


facility,


c. disposes of or transports medical marijuana, medical


marijuana products, and medical marijuana waste on


behalf of or for a licensed medical marijuana waste


disposal facility,





Req. No. 1446 Page 12


d. tests and conducts research on medical marijuana and


medical marijuana products on behalf of or for a


medical marijuana licensed testing laboratory,


e. transports, stores, and distributes, but does not take


ownership of, medical marijuana and medical marijuana


products on behalf of or for a licensed medical


marijuana commercial transporter,


f. tracks, traces, reports, and inputs any information


into the state inventory tracking system on behalf of


or for a licensed medical marijuana commercial license


holder, or


g. conducts any other additional business for the benefit


of a medical marijuana commercial license holder as


authorized by rules promulgated by the Executive


Director of the Authority, with the exception of


professional services not involved in the handling of


medical marijuana, medical marijuana products, or


medical marijuana concentrates;


2. “Medical marijuana facility” means an entity licensed or


certified by the Authority to acquire, cultivate, process,


manufacture, test, store, sell, transport, or deliver medical


marijuana; and


3. “Owner” means a direct beneficial owner including, but not


limited to, all persons or entities as follows:

Req. No. 1446 Page 13


a. all shareholders owning an interest of a corporate


entity and all officers of a corporate entity,


b. all partners of a general partnership,


c. all general partners and all limited partners that own


an interest in a limited partnership,


d. all members that own an interest in a limited


liability company,


e. all beneficiaries that hold a beneficial interest in a


trust and all trustees of a trust,


f. all persons or entities that own interest in a joint


venture,


g. all persons or entities that own an interest in an


association,


h. the owners of any other type of legal entity, and


i. any other person holding an interest or convertible


note in any entity which owns, operates, or manages a


licensed medical marijuana facility.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1446 CAD 1/19/2025 5:40:35 AM









Req. No. 1446 Page 14